apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON V-INFL-COMMON-SECOND-ND

V-INFL-FINITE ;
V-INFL-NON-FINITE-ND ;
%<asif%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>с%{I%} V-INFL-ASIF ;
%<asif%>%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>с%{I%} V-INFL-ASIF ;

LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE

V-INFL-NON-FINITE-IRREG ;
V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;
%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;
!  Imperatives

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: IMP ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р IMP ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з IMP ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң IMP ;                      ! Dir/LR
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>%{L%}%{A%}р IMP ;
%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р IMP ;
%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з IMP ;
%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{I%}ң IMP ;                      ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>%{L%}%{A%}р IMP ;

LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE-ND

V-INFL-NON-FINITE-IRREG ;
V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;
%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG ;

LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE-IRREG

! Participles
%<prc_vol%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;     ! no negative form
%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
%<neg%>%<prc_perf%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{E%} # ;
%<prc_plan%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} CLIT-GANA-ETC ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_ala%>:%>м%{A%}й%{I%}нч%{A%} # ;       ! no negative form  ! rare IS
%<gna_perf%>:%>%{I%}п CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<neg%>%<gna_perf%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<gna_until%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}нч%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<gna_after%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;


! Gerunds
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}р GER-INFL ;     ! <coop> IS only ?
%<ger_fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р GER-INFL ;                        ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%с GER-INFL ;              !
%<neg%>%<ger_fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}с GER-INFL ;          ! Dir/LR

!! Affirmative forms with л{I}к may exist?
%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к GER-INFL ;                     ! Dir/LR
%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р%>л%{I%}к GER-INFL ;                ! Dir/LR

!! Forms with only one {A} should be analysed
%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р GER-INFL ;                              ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}ст%{I%}к GER-INFL ;                ! Dir/LR

!! Forms with two {A}s should be generated
%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<ger_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}ст%{I%}к GER-INFL ;


! Verbal Adjectives
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р V-ADJ ;                            ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;                  !
%<neg%>%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}с V-ADJ ;              ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<gpr_pot2%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}с V-ADJ ;

!! Forms with only one {A} should be analysed
%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}р GER-INFL ;                              ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}ст%{I%}к GER-INFL ;                ! Dir/LR

!! Forms with two {A}s should be generated
%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р GER-INFL ;
%<neg%>%<gpr_ppot%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}ст%{I%}к GER-INFL ;




LEXICON IMP
!!! Stuff that can come after imperative forms !!!

%+чы%<emph%>:%>ч%{I%} # ;
# ;


LEXICON V-INFL-NON-FINITE-REG

! Participles
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} # ;   ! rare IS
%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-COND ;

! Participles used with copulas
%<prc_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н # ; ! used with <cop><ifi> or бол<v><iv> forms for different tense/aspect
%<prc_hab%>:%>м%{A%}й # ;   ! used with copulas
                                                !  бармай болдум - I decided to go, бармай мага жакпайт - I don't like going all the time
                                                ! but it only has the nominal unpossessed form
%<prc_fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р # ;  ! used with copulas
%<prc_fut%>:%>%{A%}р # ;       ! Dir/LR
%<prc_irre%>:%>%{E%}т # ;
%<prc_pcond%>:%>м%{A%}к # ;    ! in -мАк эле- etc.

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-COND ;

! Gerunds
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н GER-INFL ; ! <coop> IS only ?
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-INFL ; !
%<ger_pres%>:%>%{I%}ш GER-INFL ;    ! <coop> IS only
%<ger%>:%>%{U%}%{U%} GER-INFL ;     ! <coop> IS only
%<ger_abst%>:%>%{U%}%{U%}%>ч%{I%}%>%{L%}%{I%}к GER-INFL ;     ! <coop> IS only
%<ger_notyet%>:%>%{E%}% элек GER-INFL ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay
%<gpr%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay  ! both past (or perf?) and general
%<gpr_hab%>:%>ч%{U%} V-ADJ ;  ! <pl> IS okay
%<gpr_pot%>:%>%{U%}%{U%}%>ч%{U%} V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_notyet%>:%>%{E%}% элек V-ADJ ;

!  Optative/jussive forms

%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н V-CLIT ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}н # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н V-CLIT ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}л%{I%} V-CLIT ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}йл%{I%} V-CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{E%}л%{I%}к V-CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}йл%{I%}к V-CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}л%{A%} # ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%[%+p3pl%]:%>с%{I%}н V-CLIT ;


LEXICON V-INFL-FINITE

! Regular finite forms
V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;
%<neg%>:%>%{B%}%{A%} V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE ;

! Irregular finite forms
V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE ;


LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;                                     !
%<aor%>%<evid%>:%>%{E%}%>т% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                 !

! evidential recent past
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}пт%{I%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}п V-PERS-COP-SUF-NOP3 ;                    ! Dir/LR

%<pih%>:%>ч%{U%} V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                                 !


LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                                 !
%<fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                            ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%с V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                  !
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}с V-PERS-COP-SUF ;              ! Dir/LR

%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;                                !
%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жок V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                !
!%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;             ! FIXME: what to do about this

%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                           !
%<neg%>%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ;              !

%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;             ! evidential general past
%<neg%>%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жок% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; ! evidential general past

%<pcond%>:%>м%{A%}к V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                              !
%<neg%>%<pcond%>:%>м%{A%}к% эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                 !

!%<opt%>:%>м%{A%}к%>ч%{I%} V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                        !

! Things without negative forms
%<pot%>:%>ч%{U%}%>д%{A%}й V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                        !
%<notyet%>:%>%{E%}% элек V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                         !



LEXICON V-INFL-ASIF

%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;
%<ger_past%>%<sim%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{D%}%{A%}й PRED ;
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-SHORT

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}%{l%}%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;

! LEXICON V-INFL-IV-SHORT
!
! %<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! ! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-IV
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON Verbs
де:де V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "say"
же:же V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "eat"
жуу:жуу V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "wash"
куу:куу V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "chase"
